District of Columbia statutes.
5-116.33

Body-Worn Camera Program; reporting requirements.

(a)

By October 1, 2015, and every 6 months thereafter, the Mayor shall collect, and make available in a publicly accessible format, data on the Metropolitan Police Department’s Body-Worn Camera Program, including:

(1)

How many hours of body-worn camera recordings were collected;

(2)

How many times body-worn cameras failed while officers were on shift and the reasons for the failures;

(3)

How many times internal investigations were opened for a failure to turn on body-worn cameras during interactions;

(4)

How many times body-worn camera recordings were used by the Metropolitan Police Department in internal affairs investigations;

(5)

How many times body-worn camera recordings were used by the Metropolitan Police Department to investigate complaints made by an individual or group;

(6)

How many body-worn cameras are assigned to each police district and police unit for the reporting period; and

(7)

How many Freedom of Information Act requests the Metropolitan Police Department received for body-worn camera recordings during the reporting period, and the outcome of each request, including any reasons for denial.

(b)

The Metropolitan Police Department shall provide the Office of Police Complaints with direct access to body-worn camera recordings.

History

Oct. 22, 2015, D.C. Law 21-36, § 3004, 62 DCR 10905

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 3004 of the Fiscal Year 2016 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-127, July 27, 2015, 62 DCR 10201).